South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-750 (A) and (B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) In the absence of mitigating circumstances, it is unlawful for a motor vehicle driver, while driving on a road, street, or highway of the State, to fail to stop when signaled by a law enforcement vehicle by means of a siren or flashing light. An attempt to increase the speed of a vehicle or in other manner avoid the pursuing law enforcement vehicle when signaled by a siren or flashing light is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section. Failure to see the flashing light or hear the siren does not excuse a failure to stop when the distance between the vehicles and other road conditions are such that it would be reasonable for a driver to hear or see the signals from the law enforcement vehicle. (B) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (A): (1) for a first offense where no great bodily injury or death resulted from the violation, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than five hundred dollars or imprisoned for not less than ninety days nor more than three years. The Department of Motor Vehicles must suspend the person's driver's license for at least thirty days; or (2) for a second or subsequent offense where no great bodily injury or death resulted from the violation, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned for not more than fiveten years. The person's driver's license must be suspended by the department for a period of one year from the date of the conviction; or (3) where the person is found to have led law enforcement upon a high-speed pursuit, the person is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned for not less than one year and not more than five years, no part of which may be suspended, and the person's driver's license must be suspended for a period of one year from the date of conviction. For the purposes of this section, a high-speed pursuit occurs when the driver of the vehicle increases speed or takes evasive actions to avoid the pursuing law enforcement vehicle. Section 56-5-750(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (A) and when driving performs an act forbidden by law or neglects a duty imposed by law in the driving of the vehicle: (1) where great bodily injury resulted, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned for not more than ten fifteen years; or (2) where death resulted, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned for not more than twenty-fivethirty years. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect one year after approval of the Governor. ----XX----